District of Columbia statutes.
32-831

Repealed

Employers to furnish seats for employees.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 1895, 28 Stat. 964, ch. 192, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 37(a), 23 DCR 2544
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 9, 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 36-901.
1973 Ed., § 36-310.